New York, session 2025-2026, A5652.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 365-a of the social services law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 11 to read as follows: 3 11. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or any 4 other provision of law, on and after the effective date of this subdivi- 5 sion, the state is required to allow counties to opt out of providing 6 optional medical assistance services to any new enrollees who have 7 either never received such benefits or who have reenrolled after a peri- 8 od of absence. 9 (b) The commissioner of health is authorized to apply for any and all 10 federal waivers required to implement the provisions of this subdivi- 11 sion. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05083-01-5